Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study  pretrial release
practices and outcomes in Oregon.
(2) When performing  the study described in subsection (1) of this section, the commission
shall examine the following:
(a) Aggregate data related to the pretrial phase of criminal proceedings;
(b) Data regarding failures to appear for court hearings;
(c) Demographic data of the pretrial release populations; and
(d) Other data the commission deems relevant to pretrial proceedings, processes, prac-
tices and outcomes.
(3) The commission shall submit a report detailing the results  of the study to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to the judiciary in the manner provided un-
der ORS 192.245 no  later than May 1, 2027. The report shall contain data aggregated at both
the statewide and countywide level for each subject described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(4) The Judicial Department shall assist the commission  in the performance of the study
and, to the extent permitted by laws  related to confidentiality, shall provide to the commis-
sion any information the commission considers necessary to perform the study.
(5) Data reported pursuant to this section may only  be used for statistical purposes and
not for any other purpose, and the data reports  may not contain information that reveals
the identity of any individual. Data collected by government agencies or held by  the com-
mission pursuant to this section that may reveal the identity of any  individual is exempt
from public disclosure in any manner.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
Enrolled House Bill 2935 (HB 2935-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2935 (HB 2935-INTRO) Page 2